Georgia statutes. TITLE 37 Mental Health
Article 6 [Repealed effective June 30, 2025] Behavioral Health Reform and Innovation Commission

37-1-110.
[Repealed effective June 30, 2025] Legislative findings.

The General Assembly finds and determines that:

Over the last decade the State of Georgia has invested significant resources toward the transformation of the behavioral health service delivery system; and

The conclusion of the settlement agreement with the United States Department of Justice will mark significant accomplishments in system performance and presents the opportunity to conduct a systematic study to promote the continued progress of the state
behavioral health system. Such a study and the formulation of recommendations for behavioral health innovation can best be carried out through an established commission.

History. Code 1981, §

37-1-110

, enacted by Ga. L. 2019, p. 614, § 1/HB 514.

37-1-110.
[Repealed effective June 30, 2025] Legislative findings.

History. Code 1981, §

37-1-110

, enacted by Ga. L. 2019, p. 614, § 1/HB 514.

37-1-111.
[Repealed effective June 30, 2025] Commission created; “commission” defined.

There is created the Georgia Behavioral Health Reform and Innovation Commission for the purpose of conducting a comprehensive review of the behavioral health system in Georgia. Such review shall include the behavioral health services and facilities available
in this state, the identification of behavioral health issues in children, adolescents, and adults, the role the educational system has in the identification and treatment of behavioral health issues, the impact behavioral health
issues have on the court system and correctional system, the legal and systemic barriers to treatment of mental illnesses, workforce shortages that impact the delivery of care, whether there is sufficient access to behavioral health
services and supports and the role of payers in such access, the impact on how untreated behavioral illness can impact children into adulthood, the need for aftercare for persons exiting the criminal justice system, and the impact
of behavioral illness on the state’s homeless population.

As used in this article, the term “commission” means the Georgia Behavioral Health Reform and Innovation Commission.

History. Code 1981, §

37-1-111

, enacted by Ga. L. 2019, p. 614, § 1/HB 514.

37-1-111.
[Repealed effective June 30, 2025] Commission created; “commission” defined.

History. Code 1981, §

37-1-111

, enacted by Ga. L. 2019, p. 614, § 1/HB 514.

37-1-112.
[Repealed effective June 30, 2025] Members; terms; officers; operational matters.

The commission shall be composed of 24 members as follows:

The following members appointed by the Governor:

A chairperson;

A psychiatrist who specializes in children and adolescents;

A psychiatrist who specializes in adults;

A health care provider with expertise in traumatic brain injuries;

A state education official with broad experience in education policy;

A chief executive officer of a mental health facility;

A forensic psychologist;

A local education official; and

The following members appointed by the President of the Senate:

The following members appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives:

The following members appointed by the Chief Justice of the Supreme Court of Georgia:

Each nonlegislative member of the commission shall be appointed to serve for a term of two years or until his or her successor is duly appointed. Legislative members of the commission shall serve until completion of their current terms of office. Any
member may be appointed to succeed himself or herself on the commission. If a member of the commission is an elected or appointed official, such member, or his or her designee, shall be removed from the commission if such member
no longer serves as such elected or appointed official.

The following members shall serve as nonvoting ex officio members of the commission:

The commission may elect officers, other than the chairperson, as it deems necessary. The chairperson shall vote only to break a tie.

The commission shall be attached for administrative purposes only to the Office of Planning and Budget. The Office of Planning and Budget and the Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Disabilities shall provide staff support for the commission.
The Office of Planning and Budget and the Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Disabilities shall use any funds specifically appropriated to such office and department to support the work of the commission.

A professional who specializes in substance abuse and addiction;

Two members of the Senate;

A sheriff;

A licensed clinical behavioral health professional;

A behavioral health advocate; and

A representative of a community service board;

Two members of the House of Representatives;

A police chief;

A licensed clinical behavioral health professional;

A behavioral health advocate; and

A judge who presides in an accountability court, as defined in Code Section 15-1-18; and

One Justice of the Supreme Court of Georgia; and

Two judges.

Commissioner of behavioral health and developmental disabilities or his or her designee;

Commissioner of juvenile justice or his or her designee;

Commissioner of corrections or his or her designee;

Commissioner of community health or his or her designee;

Commissioner of community supervision;

Director of the Georgia Bureau of Investigation or his or her designee; and

Director of the Division of Family and Children Services of the Department of Human Services or his or her designee.

History. Code 1981, §

37-1-112

, enacted by Ga. L. 2019, p. 614, § 1/HB 514; Ga. L. 2020, p. 493, § 37/SB 429.

The 2020 amendment,
effective July 29, 2020, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, substituted “Commissioner of behavioral health and developmental disabilities” for “Commissioner of the Department of Behavioral Health
and Developmental Disabilities” in paragraph (c)(1); substituted “Commissioner of juvenile justice” for “Commissioner of the Department of Juvenile Justice” in paragraph (c)(2); substituted “Commissioner of corrections” for “Commissioner
of the Department of Corrections” in paragraph (c)(3); substituted “Commissioner of community health” for “Commissioner of the Department of Community Health” in paragraph (c)(4); and substituted “Commissioner of community supervision”
for “Commissioner of the Department of Community Supervision” in paragraph (c)(5).

37-1-112.
[Repealed effective June 30, 2025] Members; terms; officers; operational matters.

History. Code 1981, §

37-1-112

, enacted by Ga. L. 2019, p. 614, § 1/HB 514; Ga. L. 2020, p. 493, § 37/SB 429.

37-1-113.
[Repealed effective June 30, 2025] Meetings; prior approval of agenda; quorum; allowances and reimbursements.

The commission may conduct meetings at such places and times as it deems necessary or convenient to enable it to fully and effectively exercise its powers, perform its duties, and accomplish the objectives and purposes of this article. The commission
shall hold meetings at the call of the chairperson. The commission shall meet not less than twice every year.

Until the conclusion of the settlement agreement with the United States Department of Justice, the agenda for any meeting of the commission shall be submitted to the Governor’s Executive Counsel for prior approval.

A quorum for transacting business shall be a majority of the members of the commission.

Legislative members of the commission shall receive the allowances provided for in Code Section 28-1-8. Nonlegislative members shall receive a daily expense allowance in the amount specified in subsection (b) of Code Section 45-7-21 as well as the mileage
or transportation allowance authorized for state employees. Members of the commission who are state officials, other than legislative members, or state employees shall receive no compensation for their services on the commission,
but shall be reimbursed for expenses incurred by them in the performance of their duties as members of the commission in the same manner as they are reimbursed for expenses in their capacities as state officials or state employees.
The funds necessary for the reimbursement of the expenses of state officials, other than legislative members, and state employees shall come from funds appropriated to or otherwise available to their respective departments. All
other funds necessary to carry out the provisions of this article shall come from funds appropriated to the Senate and the House of Representatives.

History. Code 1981, §

37-1-113

, enacted by Ga. L. 2019, p. 614, § 1/HB 514.

37-1-113.
[Repealed effective June 30, 2025] Meetings; prior approval of agenda; quorum; allowances and reimbursements.

History. Code 1981, §

37-1-113

, enacted by Ga. L. 2019, p. 614, § 1/HB 514.

37-1-114.
[Repealed effective June 30, 2025] Duties and powers; use of third parties.

The commission shall have the following duties:

To review the conditions, needs, issues, and problems related to behavioral health issues in this state and to recommend any action, including proposed changes to rules, regulations, policies, and programs, and proposed legislation which the commission
deems necessary or appropriate;

To evaluate and consider the best practices, experiences, and results of legislation in other states with regard to the behavioral health system with respect to both children and adults; and

To annually report on the work of the commission to the Governor, President of the Senate, and Speaker of the House of Representatives.

The commission shall have the following powers:

To evaluate how the laws, rules, regulations, policies, and programs affecting the behavioral health system in this state are working;

To request and receive data from and review the records of appropriate state agencies and courts to the greatest extent allowed by state and federal law;

To accept public or private grants, devises, and bequests;

To authorize entering into contracts or agreements through the commission’s chairperson necessary or incidental to the performance of its duties;

To establish rules and procedures for conducting the business of the commission; and

To conduct studies, hold public meetings, collect data, or take any other action the commission deems necessary to fulfill its responsibilities.

The commission shall be authorized to retain the services of attorneys, consultants, subject matter experts, economists, budget analysts, data analysts, statisticians, and other individuals or organizations as determined appropriate by the commission.
Such services may be obtained through a request for proposal process conducted through the Office of Planning and Budget; provided, however, that any final selection shall be approved by the commission.

History. Code 1981, §

37-1-114

, enacted by Ga. L. 2019, p. 614, § 1/HB 514.

37-1-114.
[Repealed effective June 30, 2025] Duties and powers; use of third parties.

History. Code 1981, §

37-1-114

, enacted by Ga. L. 2019, p. 614, § 1/HB 514.

37-1-114.1
[Repealed effective June 30, 2025] Authority of commission.

The commission shall be authorized to:

Collaborate with the Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Disabilities regarding the assisted outpatient treatment program to develop fidelity protocols for grantees and a training and education program for use by the grantees to train and
educate staff, community partners, and others; and provide consultation to the Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Disabilities in the selection of an organization, entity, or consultant to perform research pursuant
to Code Section 37-1-126 and in the development of rules and regulations pursuant to Code Section 37-1-127;

Coordinate initiatives to assist local communities in keeping people with serious mental illness out of county and municipal jails and detention facilities, including juvenile detention and, facilitated by nationally recognized experts, to improve outcomes
for individuals who have frequent contact with criminal justice, homeless, and behavioral health systems, termed “familiar faces,” including, but not limited to:

Serving as liaison to state and local leaders to inform policy and funding priorities;

Developing a shared definition of “serious mental illness” in consultation with relevant mental health, judicial, and law enforcement officials and experts;

Exploring funding options to implement universal screening upon admission into a county or municipal jail or detention facility;

Developing proposed state guidelines, tools, and templates to facilitate sharing of information among state and local entities compliant with state and federal privacy laws;

Adopting recommendations to promote the use of pre-arrest diversion strategies that reduce revocations and reduce unnecessary contact with the justice system;

Developing a shared definition for “high utilization” in consultation with relevant behavioral health and criminal justice experts;

Implementing improvements to data sharing across and between local and state agencies;

Improving strategies to refer and connect individuals to needed community based health and social services, including addressing gaps in continuity of care;

Expanding the use of and support for forensic peer monitors; and

Analyzing best practices to address and ameliorate the increase in chronic homelessness among persons with behavioral health and substance abuse disorder, particularly the challenges of unsheltered homelessness, and formulating recommendations for policies
and funding to address such issues, considering the best practices of other states and the permissible use of all available funding sources;

Convene representatives from care management organizations, pediatric primary care physicians, family medicine physicians, pediatric hospitals, pharmacy benefits managers, other insurers, experts on early childhood mental health, and pediatric mental
health and substance use disorder care professionals to examine:

How to develop and implement a mechanism for Georgia’s managed care program for children, youth, and young adults in foster care, children and youth receiving adoption assistance, and select youth involved in the juvenile justice system to meet the mental
and behavioral health needs of such children, youth, and young adults;

How to develop and implement a mechanism to provide adoptive caregivers with the support necessary to meet the mental and behavioral health needs of children and adolescents for the first 12 months after finalization of adoption;

Best practices, potential cost savings, decreased administrative burdens, increased transparency regarding prescription drug costs, and impact on turnover on the mental health and substance use disorder professionals workforce; and

Best practices for community mental health and substance use disorder services reimbursement, including payment structures and rates that cover the cost of service provision for outpatient care, high-fidelity wraparound services, and therapeutic foster
care homes, within the bounds of federal regulatory guidance; and

Establish advisory committees to evaluate specific issues, including:

Identifying methods to create pathways of care, including physical, behavioral, and dental health care, for children and adolescents, regardless of an individual’s specific insurance carrier or insurance coverage; and

Developing and recommending a solution to ensure appropriate health care services and supports, including better care coordination, for pediatric patients residing in this state who have mental health or substance use disorders and who have had high utilization
of emergency departments, crisis services, or psychiatric residential treatment facilities, for the purpose of streamlining care, improving outcomes, reducing return visits to emergency departments, and assisting case managers
and clinicians in providing safe treatment while reducing fragmentation.

History. Code 1981, §

37-1-114.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 2022, p. 26, § 6-2/HB 1013Ga. L. 2022, p. HB 1013, § 6-2/HB 1013.

Effective date.

This Code section became effective July 1, 2022.

37-1-114.1
[Repealed effective June 30, 2025] Authority of commission.

History. Code 1981, §

37-1-114.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 2022, p. 26, § 6-2/HB 1013Ga. L. 2022, p. HB 1013, § 6-2/HB 1013.

37-1-115.
[Repealed effective June 30, 2025] Subcommittees.

The chairperson of the commission shall appoint the following subcommittees from among the membership of the commission and may also appoint up to two other noncommission-member persons as he or she may determine to be necessary as relevant to and consistent
with this article:

Children and Adolescent Behavioral Health;

Involuntary Commitment;

Hospital and Short-Term Care Facilities;

Mental Health Courts and Corrections; and

Workforce and System Development.

The chairperson, at his or her discretion, may designate and appoint other subcommittees from among the membership of the commission and may also appoint up to two other noncommission-member persons as he or she may determine to be necessary as relevant
to and consistent with this article.

History. Code 1981, §

37-1-115

, enacted by Ga. L. 2019, p. 614, § 1/HB 514.

37-1-115.
[Repealed effective June 30, 2025] Subcommittees.

History. Code 1981, §

37-1-115

, enacted by Ga. L. 2019, p. 614, § 1/HB 514.

37-1-115.1.
[Repealed effective June 30, 2025] Exploration of community supervision strategies for individuals with mental illness.

The Mental Health Courts and Corrections Subcommittee of the Georgia Behavioral Health Reform and Innovation Commission shall continue its exploration of community supervision strategies for individuals with mental illnesses, including:

Exploring opportunities to expand access to mental health specialized caseloads to reach a larger share of the supervision population with mental health needs, including prioritizing equitable access to specialized caseloads;

Assessing the quality of mental health supervision and adherence to evidence based standards to determine how mental health supervision could be improved and identifying services, supports, and training that could equip law enforcement officers to more
successfully engage with and reduce recidivism for individuals on community supervision;

Assessing the availability of mental health treatment providers by supervision region to estimate accessability to treatment across the state; and

Tracking qualitative and quantitative metrics on the outcomes of any changes made to community supervision strategies for individuals with mental illness to determine the effectiveness of such strategies.

History. Code 1981, §

37-1-115.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 2022, p. 26, § 4-8/HB 1013.

Effective date.

This Code section became effective July 1, 2022.

37-1-115.1.
[Repealed effective June 30, 2025] Exploration of community supervision strategies for individuals with mental illness.

History. Code 1981, §

37-1-115.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 2022, p. 26, § 4-8/HB 1013; Code 1981, §

37-1-115.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 2022, p. 26, § 4-8/HB 1013.

37-1-116.
[Repealed effective June 30, 2025] Abolishment and termination.

The commission shall be abolished and this article shall stand repealed on June 30, 2025.

History. Code 1981, §

37-1-116

, enacted by Ga. L. 2019, p. 614, § 1/HB 514; Ga. L. 2022, p. 26, § 6-3/HB 1013.

The 2022 amendment,
effective July 1, 2022, substituted “June 30, 2025” for “June 30, 2023”.

37-1-116.1.
[Repealed effective June 30, 2025] Exploration of community supervision strategies for individuals with mental illness.

History. Code 1981, §

37-1-116

, enacted by Ga. L. 2019, p. 614, § 1/HB 514; Ga. L. 2022, p. 26, § 6-3/HB 1013; Code 1981, §

37-1-115.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 2022, p. 26, § 4-8/HB 1013.

Effective date. —

This article became effective July 1, 2019.